Massachusetts, session 194th, S3056.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7 of Chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting the following subsection:-
"(k) The commissioner shall promulgate regulations which provide for the registration of
rest homes that are duly licensed pursuant to section 71 of Chapter 111, to permit Responsible
Persons who are employed by the rest home to administer medication to residents who are not
self-administering."
of 1